assignment1-DinhCuongLuc.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +PastPart + Past + PresPart +ADJ +3P +Sg +Pl -ion -or -able -ity

LEXICON Root
Verb;

! Assignment 1.1
LEXICON Verb
translate Vinf;
predict   Vinf;

! 1.1: simple verb inflection (bare and 3rd person singular)
LEXICON Vinf
+V:0             #;
+V+3P+Sg: s       #;

! 1.2: nominalization with -ion and -or (with singular and plural)
!       use ^ as a morpheme boundary marker (for spelling rules)
LEXICON Deriv
-ion +N : ^ion NInfl ;
-or  +N : ^or  NInfl ;
-able +ADJ : ^able Adj ;    ! 1.3: adjectivization with -able

LEXICON NInfl
+Sg : 0 # ;
+Pl : s # ;

! 1.4: nominalization from adjective with -ity (no plural allowed)
LEXICON Adj
0           : 0   # ;       ! allow stopping at ADJ (translatable/predictable)
-ity +N     : ^ity NNoPl ;  ! derive noun with -ity, no plural forms

LEXICON NNoPl

0 : 0 # ;
